Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-2801
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-2801 to 38-28,117 and the Nebraska Drug Product Selection Act shall be known and may be cited as the Pharmacy Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB247, § 79;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 897;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 47;

Laws 2009, LB604, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB179, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 29;

Laws 2017, LB166, § 9;

Laws 2017, LB481, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 67;

Laws 2019, LB74, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 52;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 13;

Laws 2026, LB912, § 17.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Drug Product Selection Act, see section 38-28,108.